praksid/praks1/kalajt.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+Sg                ! ainsus
+Pl                ! mitmus
+Nom               ! nimetav
+Gen               ! omastav


LEXICON Root

kala Lõpp1 ; 
tala  Lõpp1 ;
redel  Lõpp2 ;
post  Lõpp2 ;

LEXICON Lõpp1
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Pl+Nom:d # ;
 
LEXICON Lõpp2
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Gen:i # ;
+Pl+Nom:id # ;
 
  
